District of Columbia statutes.
44-662.05

Multi-hospital systems, closure, merger, and new hospitals.

(a)

If a hospital system conducts, operates, or maintains more than one hospital licensed by the Department of Health, the hospital system shall pay the fee for each hospital separately.

(b)

(1)

Notwithstanding § 44-662.03, if a hospital system or person that is subject to a fee under § 44-662.03 ceases to conduct, operate, or maintain a hospital, as evidenced by the transfer or surrender of a hospital license, the fee for the DFY in which the cessation occurs shall be adjusted by multiplying the fee computed under § 44-662.03 by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of days in the year during which the hospital system or person conducts, operates, or maintains the hospital and the denominator of which is 365.

(2)

Immediately upon ceasing to conduct, operate, or maintain a hospital, the hospital system or person shall pay the fee for the year as so adjusted, to the extent not previously paid.

(c)

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a hospital system or person who conducts, operates, or maintains a hospital, upon notice by the Department, shall pay the fee required under §  44-662.03 in accordance with subsection (a) of this section on the due date stated in the notice and on the regular installment due dates for the DFY occurring after the due date of the initial notice.

History

Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 5076, 62 DCR 10905